Montana, session 2025, HB110.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 5-11-212, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-11-212. Fees for proceedings -- electronic version requirement. (1) A complete set of the
proceedings of a regular or special session of the legislature may be purchased from the legislative services
division for the amount prescribed by the legislative council. Upon receipt of payment, the executive director of
the legislative services division shall supply the purchaser with a complete set of the proceedings.
(2) A purchaser who requests that a set of the proceedings be mailed shall pay an additional fee
as prescribed by the council for each complete set that is mailed.
(3) Single copies of bills, resolutions, or amendments to bills or resolutions may be purchased from
the legislative services division for a price varying with the length of the document as prescribed by the
legislative council.
(4) Single copies of status sheets or status of proceedings may be purchased from the legislative
services division for a price per copy as prescribed by the legislative council. A person may subscribe to receive
daily copies of the status sheets or status of proceedings by mail for a fee set by the legislative council to cover
the costs of the service.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 110
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 110
(3) The legislative services division shall provide an electronic version of each bill and resolution
and each amendment to a bill or resolution.
(5)(4) The executive director of the legislative services division shall account for all funds collected
under this section and shall transmit the funds to the treasurer of the state of Montana, who shall credit them to
the general fund."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 110
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 110, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 110
INTRODUCED BY S. FITZPATRICK
BY REQUEST OF THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
AN ACT REVISING REQUIREMENTS FOR THE LEGISLATIVE SERVICES DIVISION TO SELL CERTAIN
PRINTED INFORMATION RELATED TO A LEGISLATIVE SESSION; ELIMINATING THE REQUIREMENT FOR
THE LEGISLATIVE SERVICES DIVISION TO SELL SINGLE COPIES OF BILLS, RESOLUTIONS, AND
AMENDMENTS AND TO PROVIDE A SUBSCRIPTION SERVICE TO ACCESS STATUS SHEETS; REQUIRING
THE LEGISLATIVE SERVICES DIVISION TO PROVIDE ELECTRONIC VERSIONS OF BILLS, RESOLUTIONS,
AND AMENDMENTS; AMENDING SECTION 5-11-212, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE
DATE.”